es: Tipo de rodamiento del yo-yo: Rodamiento de bolas (estándar); Rodamiento center-trac; Rodamiento cóncavo; Eje fijo (sin rodamiento); Rodamiento plano; Rodamiento estrecho (con respuesta); Rodamiento ancho (sin respuesta); Otro
de: Typ des Jojo-Lagers: Kugellager (Standard); Center-Trac-Lager; Konkaves Lager; Feste Achse (ohne Lager); Flaches Lager; Schmales Lager (responsiv); Breites Lager (nicht responsiv); Sonstige
sv: Jojo-lagertyp: Kullager (standard); Center-trac-lager; Konkavt lager; Fast axel (inget lager); Platt lager; Smalt lager (responsivt); Brett lager (icke-responsivt); Övrigt
ru: Тип подшипника йо-йо: Шарикоподшипник (стандартный); Подшипник Center-Trac; Вогнутый подшипник (Concave); Фиксированная ось (без подшипника); Плоский подшипник; Узкий подшипник (с отдачей); Широкий подшипник (без отдачи); Другой
sk-SK: Typ ložiska jojo: Guľôčkové ložisko (štandardné); Ložisko Center-Trac; Konkávne ložisko; Pevná oska (bez ložiska); Ploché ložisko; Úzke ložisko (responzívne); Široké ložisko (neresponzívne); Iné
el: Τύπος ρουλεμάν γιο-γιο: Ρουλεμάν (τυπικό); Ρουλεμάν center-trac; Κοίλο ρουλεμάν; Σταθερός άξονας (χωρίς ρουλεμάν); Επίπεδο ρουλεμάν; Στενό ρουλεμάν (με απόκριση); Φαρδύ ρουλεμάν (χωρίς απόκριση); Άλλο
cs: Typ ložiska jo-jo: Kuličkové ložisko (standardní); Ložisko Center-Trac; Konkávní ložisko; Pevná osa (bez ložiska); Ploché ložisko; Úzké ložisko (responzivní); Široké ložisko (neresponzivní); Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul rulmentului pentru yo-yo: Rulment cu bile (standard); Rulment center-trac; Rulment concav; Ax fix (fără rulment); Rulment plat; Rulment îngust (reactiv); Rulment lat (nereactiv); Altele
bg-BG: Тип лагер на йо-йото: Сачмен лагер (стандартен); Center-trac лагер; Вдлъбнат лагер; Фиксирана ос (без лагер); Плосък лагер; Тясен лагер (отговаря бързо); Широк лагер (неоткликващ); Други
nl: Yo-yo lagertype: Kogellager (standaard); Center-Trac-lager; Concaaf lager; Vaste as (geen lager); Plat lager; Smal lager (responsief); Breed lager (non-responsief); Overig
hu: Jojó csapágyának típusa: Golyóscsapágy (standard); Center-trac csapágy; Konkáv csapágy; Fix tengely (csapágy nélküli); Lapos csapágy; Keskeny csapágy (reszponzív); Széles csapágy (nem reszponzív); Egyéb
da: Lejetype for yo-yo: Kugleleje (standard); Center-trac-leje; Konkavt leje; Fast aksel (intet leje); Fladt leje; Smalt leje (responsiv); Bredt leje (uresponsiv); Andet
fi: Jojo-laakerin tyyppi: Kuulalaakeri (vakio); Center-trac-laakeri; Kovera laakeri; Kiinteä akseli (ei laakeria); Tasainen laakeri; Kapea laakeri (reagoiva); Leveä laakeri (ei-reagoiva); Muu
pt-BR: Ioiô tipo de rolamento: Rolamento de esferas (padrão); Rolamento Center Trac; Rolamento côncavo; Eixo fixo (sem rolamento); Rolamento plano; Rolamento estreito (responsivo); Rolamento largo (não responsivo); Outros
ko: 요요 베어링 타입: 볼 베어링(표준); 센터 트랙 베어링; 오목 베어링; 고정 축(베어링 없음); 평면 베어링; 좁은 베어링(응답형); 넓은 베어링(비응답형); 기타
lt-LT: Jo-jo guolio tipas: Rutulinis guolis (standartinis); „Center-Trac“ guolis; Įgaubtas guolis; Fiksuota ašis (be guolio); Plokščias guolis; Siauras guolis (reaguojantis); Platus guolis (nereaguojantis); Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta jo-jo ležaja: Kuglični ležaj (standardni); Center-Trac ležaj; Konkavni ležaj; Fiksna osovina (bez ležaja); Ravni ležaj; Uski ležaj (reaktivan); Široki ležaj (nereaktivan); Ostalo
nb: Type jojo-lager: Kulelager (standard); Center-trac-lager; Konkavt lager; Fast aksel (uten lager); Flatt lager; Smalt lager (responsivt); Bredt lager (ikke-responsivt); Annet
pl: Typ łożyska jojo: Łożysko kulkowe (standardowe); Łożysko Center-Trac; Łożysko wklęsłe; Ośka stała (bez łożyska); Łożysko płaskie; Wąskie łożysko (responsywne); Szerokie łożysko (nieresponsywne); Inne
it: Tipo di cuscinetto per yo-yo: Cuscinetto a sfera (standard); Cuscinetto center-trac; Cuscinetto concavo; Asse fisso (senza cuscinetto); Cuscinetto piatto; Cuscinetto stretto (reattivo); Cuscinetto largo (non reattivo); Altro
tr: Yo-yo rulman tipi: Bilyalı rulman (standart); Center-trac rulman; İçbükey rulman; Sabit aks (rulmansız); Düz rulman; Dar rulman (duyarlı); Geniş rulman (duyarsız); Diğer
fr: Type de roulement du yo-yo: Roulement à billes (standard); Roulement Center-Trac; Roulement concave; Axe fixe (sans roulement); Roulement plat; Roulement étroit (réactif); Roulement large (non réactif); Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta ležaja jo-jo: Kroglični ležaj (standardni); Ležaj Center-trac; Konkavni ležaj; Fiksna os (brez ležaja); Ravni ležaj; Ozek ležaj (odziven); Širok ležaj (neodziven); Drugo
zh-CN: 溜溜球轴承类型: 滚珠轴承（标准）; Center-Trac 轴承; 凹型轴承; 固定轴（无轴承）; 平型轴承; 窄轴承（响应式）; 宽轴承（无响应式）; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de rolamento do ioiô: Rolamento de esferas (padrão); Rolamento Center-Trac; Rolamento côncavo; Eixo fixo (sem rolamento); Rolamento plano; Rolamento estreito (reativo); Rolamento largo (não reativo); Outro
vi: Loại ổ trục yo-yo: Vòng bi (tiêu chuẩn); Vòng bi Center-Trac; Vòng bi lõm; Trục cố định (không có vòng bi); Vòng bi phẳng; Vòng bi hẹp (đáp ứng); Vòng bi rộng (không đáp ứng); Khác
ja: ヨーヨーベアリングタイプ: ボールベアリング (標準); センタートラックベアリング; コンケイブベアリング; 固定アクセル (ベアリングなし); フラットベアリング; ナローベアリング (レスポンシブ); ワイドベアリング (アンレスポンシブ); その他
en: Yo-yo bearing type: Ball bearing (standard); Center-trac bearing; Concave bearing; Fixed axle (no bearing); Flat bearing; Narrow bearing (responsive); Wide bearing (unresponsive); Other
zh-TW: 溜溜球軸承類型: 滾珠軸承 (標準); Center-trac 軸承; 凹面軸承; 固定輪軸 (無軸承); 平面軸承; 窄版軸承 (回應式); 寬版軸承 (無回應式); 其他
th: ลูกปืนโยโย่: ตลับลูกปืน (มาตรฐาน); ตลับลูกปืนเซ็นเตอร์แทร็ก; ตลับลูกปืนเว้า; แกนหมุนตายตัว (ไม่มีตลับลูกปืน); ตลับลูกปืนแบน; ตลับลูกปืนแคบ (ตอบสนอง); ตลับลูกปืนกว้าง (ไม่ตอบสนอง); อื่นๆ